el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Προϊόντα κάνναβης > Άτμισμα: Υγρό αναπλήρωσης (E-Liquid); Φυσίγγια ατμού; Κάψουλες ατμίσματος; Συσκευές ατμίσματος
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Продукти от канабис > Вейпинг: Никотинови течности; Пълнители за вейпове; Вейп капсули; Устройства за вейпинг
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 대마 제품 > 베이핑: 전자 액상; 베이프 카트리지; 베이프 팟(카트리지); 베이핑 장치
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Kenevir Ürünleri > Elektronik Sigara: E-sigara Likiti; Elektronik Sigara Kartuşları; Elektronik Sigara Podları; Elektronik Sigara Cihazları
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Cannabisprodukter > Vaping: E-væske; Vape-patroner; Vape-pods; Vaping-enhet
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Sản phẩm cần sa > Hút thuốc lá điện tử: Tinh dầu; Hộp tinh dầu vape; Đầu pod thuốc lá điện tử; Thiết bị vape
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Prodotti a base di cannabis > Svapo: E-Liquid; Cartucce per sigarette elettroniche; Pod per svapo; Inalatori
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > ผลิตภัณฑ์กัญชา > สูบบุหรี่ไฟฟ้า: น้ำยาบุหรี่ไฟฟ้า; ตลับน้ำยาบุหรี่ไฟฟ้า; พ็อดบุหรี่ไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์สูบไอ
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Proizvodi od kanabisa > E-cigarete: E-tekućina; Patrone za e-cigarete; Kapsule za e-cigarete; E-cigarete
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Продукты для употребления каннабиса > Для вейпинга: Жидкости для вейпинга; Картриджи для вейпов; Поды для вейпов; Устройства для вейпинга
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Cannabisproducten > Vapen: E-liquid; Vape cartridges; Vape pods; Vape-apparaten
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Cannabis-Produkte > Vapen: E-Liquids; Vape-Kartuschen; Pod-Systeme; E-Zigaretten
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Produits à base de cannabis > Vape: E-Liquide; Cartouches pour cigarette électronique; Pods; E-cigarettes
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse din canabis > Vapat: E-lichid; Cartușe pentru vaping; Poduri de vapat; Dispozitive de vaping
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Kanapių produktai > Garinimas: El. cigarečių skystis; Garinimo įrenginių kasetės; Garinimo įrenginių kapsulės; Garinimo įrenginiai
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Cannabis Products > Vaping: E-Liquid; Vape Cartridges; Vape Pods; Vaping Devices
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 大麻制品 > 电子烟: 电子烟油; 电子烟弹; 电子烟弹仓; 电子烟设备
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Kannabistuotteet > Sähkösavukkeen käyttö: Sähkösavukkeiden nesteet; Sähkösavukkeen patruunat; Sähkösavukkeen patruunat; Sähkösavukelaitteet
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Produtos de canábis > Vaporização: E-Liquid; Cartuchos para cigarros eletrónicos; Cápsulas de vape; Dispositivo de vaporização
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Produtos de cânabis > Vaporização: E-líquido; Cartuchos de vape; Pods de vape; Vaporizadores
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Izdelki iz konoplje > Vejpanje: E-Liquid; Kartuše za vejpanje; Kapsule za vejpanje; Naprave za vejpanje
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Productos de cannabis > Vapear: Líquido para cigarrillos electrónicos; Cartuchos para vapear; Cápsulas de vapeo; Dispositivos para vapear
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Konopné produkty > Vaping: E-liquidy; Cartridge (pody); Vape pody; Vapovací zařízení
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 大麻產品 > 電子菸: 電子菸油; 電子菸盒; 電子菸菸彈; 電子菸裝置
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Kannabisztermékek > Vaping: E-folyadék; Vape-patronok; Vape-podok; Vape-eszközök
ja: 食品・飲料 > 大麻商品 > ベイプ: E-リキッド; ベイプカートリッジ; ベイプポッド; ベイプデバイス
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Produkty z konopi indyjskich > Waporyzacja: Liquidy do e-papierosów; Wkłady do waporyzacji; Wkłady do waporyzacji; Urządzenia do waporyzacji
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Produkty z kanabisu > Vapovanie: E-Liquid; Vapovacie náplne; Vape pody; Vapovacie zariadenia
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Cannabisprodukter > Vejping: E-vätska; Vapepatroner; Vape pods; E-cigaretter
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Cannabisprodukter > Vaping: E-væske; Patroner til vape; Vape-pods; Vaping-enheder